Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 14. Corn Board.

§ 3.2-1400.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Corn”
means all corn sold except sugar corn, popcorn, and ornamental corn.

“Country buyer”
means any person who buys corn from a producer.

“Exporter”
means any person offering corn for export sale.

“Handler”
means any processor, dealer, shipper, country buyer, exporter, or any other business entity that purchases corn from a producer. The term shall also mean any person that buys, accepts for shipment, or otherwise acquires property in corn from a producer, and includes a mortgagee, pledgee, lienor, or other person having a claim against the producer, when the actual or constructive possession of corn is taken as part payment or in satisfaction of such mortgage, pledge, lien, or claim. The term shall also mean a producer who transports and sells his corn outside of the Commonwealth.

“Processor”
means any person who changes the physical form or characteristic of corn for the purpose of preparing it for sale.

“Producer”
means any person who grew corn in the Commonwealth and sold corn during the preceding three years.

“Seedsman”
means any person who offers corn seeds for sale.

History.

1980, c. 395, §§ 3.1-1032, 3.1-1043, 3.1-1044; 1985, c. 448; 1987, c. 476; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1401.
Corn Board; composition and appointment of members.

The Corn Board, established by the passage of a referendum held pursuant to Chapter 395 of the 1980 Acts of Assembly, is continued within the Department. The Corn Board shall be composed of 11 members appointed by the Governor and confirmed in accordance with §

2.2-107

from nominations by producer organizations representing corn producers. These organizations shall nominate at least two producers from each production area of corn as defined in §

3.2-1410

and such nominations shall be submitted at least 90 days before the expiration of the member’s term for which the recommendations are provided. If said organizations fail to provide the nominations at least 90 days before the expiration of the term, the Governor may appoint other nominees that meet the criteria provided by this section. The Governor shall appoint at least one producer from each production area and the membership of the Corn Board shall be composed of a majority of producers. The Governor shall appoint one member, if available, from each of the following classifications: seedsman, processor, country buyer, and exporter.

History.

1980, c. 395, § 3.1-1043; 1985, c. 448; 1987, c. 476; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 691, 714.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, cc. 691 and 714, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act providing for (i) staggered terms for board, council, or commission members and (ii) two-year terms for chairmen appointed by the Governor shall not affect current members or chairmen whose terms have not expired as of July 1, 2011.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 691 and 714 are identical, and added “and such nominations shall be submitted at least 90 days before the expiration of the member’s term for which the recommendations are provided” to the end of the third sentence and added the fourth sentence.

§ 3.2-1402.
Corn Board membership terms.

The terms for appointments to the Corn Board shall be three years. The Governor shall fill any vacancy occurring before the expiration of any term for the unexpired term. If possible, vacancies shall be filled from the production area or classification from which the vacancy occurred from nominations as described in §

3.2-1410

.

History.

1980, c. 395, § 3.1-1043; 1985, c. 448; 1987, c. 476; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1403.
Corn Board officers and compensation.

The Corn Board shall elect a chairman and such other officers as deemed appropriate.

Members of the Corn Board shall not receive compensation for attendance at meetings of the Corn Board, but shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

History.

1980, c. 395, § 3.1-1043; 1985, c. 448; 1987, c. 476; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1404.
Powers and duties of Corn Board.

The Corn Board shall have charge of the management and expenditure of the Virginia Corn Fund established in the state treasury.

The Corn Board may expend funds to provide for programs of market development, education, publicity, research, and the promotion of the sale and use of corn; to manage the funds so as to accumulate a reserve for contingencies; to establish an office and employ such technical, professional, and other assistants as may be required; and to contract for market development, publicity, research, advertising, and other promotional services.

The Corn Board may establish an executive committee and charge it with such powers, duties, and functions as is deemed proper.

The Corn Board may enter into an agreement with the Federal Commodity Credit Corporation to collect the specified assessment on all corn pledged as collateral for a commodity credit corporation price support loan or purchase by the Federal Commodity Credit Corporation under its loan or purchase programs.

The chairman of the Corn Board shall make an annual report to the Corn Board, including a statement of the total receipts and disbursements for the year, and shall file a copy of the report with the Commissioner.

History.

1980, c. 395, § 3.1-1043; 1985, c. 448; 1987, c. 476; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1405.
Referenda.

The Board, upon petition by a group of corn producers representing at least 10 percent of the number of the Commonwealth’s corn producers as determined by the Commissioner, may provide for a referendum on the continuation of the assessment. If the Governor shall determine that a simple majority of those voting are not in favor of the assessment, the Board shall hold no new referenda for at least one year after the Governor has declared his findings, and then only after receiving a petition signed by at least 10 percent of the number of the Commonwealth’s corn producers. The cost of conducting any such referendum as above prescribed shall come from funds paid into the Virginia Corn Fund as defined in §

3.2-1411

. The Board shall adopt regulations governing the conduct of referenda pursuant to §

3.2-112

.

History.

1980, c. 395, § 3.1-1041; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1406.
Management of referenda; Commissioner’s duties; notice.

The Commissioner shall arrange for and manage any referendum conducted under this chapter.

The Commissioner shall, 60 days before the date upon which a referendum is to be held, mail notice to the clerk of the circuit court in each locality where corn is produced. The clerk of the circuit court shall post the notice and regulations on the front door or public bulletin board of the courthouse and certify the posting to the Commissioner. The Commissioner shall give notice of the referendum in a newspaper of general circulation in Richmond, Virginia, and shall send a notice of the referendum to a newspaper of general circulation in each locality where corn is produced, at least 60 days prior to the holding of any referendum under this chapter. The notice shall contain the date, hours, and method of voting in such referendum, the amount of assessment to be collected, the means by which such assessment shall be collected, the general purposes for which the assessments will be used, and the regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to this chapter.

The Commissioner shall prepare and distribute in advance of the referendum all necessary ballots, certificates, and supplies required for such referendum and shall, under regulations adopted by the Board, arrange for the use of polling places, if necessary.

The Commissioner shall, within 10 days after the referendum, canvass and publicly declare the results thereof and certify the same to the Governor and the Board.

History.

1980, c. 395, §§ 3.1-1034, 3.1-1037 to 3.1-1039; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1407.
Question to be printed on ballots.

The question to be printed on the ballots used in a referendum held pursuant to this chapter shall be as follows:

“Do you favor additional market development, education, publicity, research, and the promotion of the sale and use of corn and the continuation of the levy of an assessment of one cent per bushel in accordance with the provisions of the Corn Board law?

_______________
For

_______________
Against.”

History.

1980, c. 395, § 3.1-1042; 1989 c. 401; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1408.
Persons eligible to vote.

Each producer who sold corn in two of the past three years next preceding the date of the referendum held pursuant to this chapter shall be eligible to vote in such referendum, provided that he shall so certify sale and point of sale on forms approved by the Board. Any person meeting such requirements shall be eligible to vote in the referendum, but no person shall be required to be a qualified voter in other respects. Any person who is not an individual shall vote by its authorized representative.

History.

1980, c. 395, § 3.1-1035; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1409.
Referenda results; action of Governor.

If the Governor finds any referendum in order and that at least a simple majority of those voting are in opposition to the continuation of the assessment on corn, he shall so proclaim and upon such proclamation the assessment on corn shall be discontinued. If the Governor finds that at least a simple majority of those voting are in favor of the continuation of the assessment on corn, the Governor shall not so proclaim.

History.

1980, c. 395, § 3.1-1039; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1410.
Production areas designated.

The following production areas are designated for the purposes of this chapter:

Area I: the Counties of Accomack, Northampton, and Isle of Wight and the Cities of Suffolk, Chesapeake, and Virginia Beach;

Area II: the Counties of Southampton, Sussex, Surry, Prince George, Dinwiddie, Greensville, and Brunswick;

Area III: the Counties of Westmoreland, Northumberland, Richmond, Lancaster, Essex, Middlesex, Mathews, King and Queen, Gloucester, King William, New Kent, York, Charles City, and James City and the City of Newport News;

Area IV: the Counties of Henrico, Hanover, Caroline, King George, Goochland, Louisa, Spotsylvania, Stafford, Fluvanna, Orange, Culpeper, Albemarle, Greene, and Madison;

Area V: the Counties of Prince William, Fairfax, Fauquier, Loudoun, Rappahannock, Warren, Clarke, Page, Shenandoah, and Frederick;

Area VI: the Counties of Mecklenburg, Lunenburg, Nottoway, Amelia, Chesterfield, Halifax, Charlotte, Prince Edward, Cumberland, Powhatan, Pittsylvania, Campbell, Appomattox, Buckingham, Bedford, Amherst, and Nelson; and

Area VII: the Counties of Henry, Franklin, Roanoke, Botetourt, Rockbridge, Augusta, Rockingham, Patrick, Floyd, Montgomery, Craig, Alleghany, Bath, Highland, Carroll, Pulaski, Giles, Grayson, Wythe, Bland, Smyth, Tazewell, Washington, Russell, Buchanan, Scott, Wise, Dickenson, and Lee.

History.

1980, c. 395, § 3.1-1043; 1985, c. 448; 1987, c. 476; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1411.
Virginia Corn Fund established.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Virginia Corn Fund, hereafter referred to as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All moneys levied and collected under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes set forth in this chapter. In carrying out the purposes of this chapter, the Corn Board may cooperate with other state, regional, national, and international agricultural organizations in market development, education, publicity, research, and the promotion of the sale and use of corn. The proceeds from such activities shall be promptly paid into the Virginia Corn Fund. The Auditor of Public Accounts shall audit all the accounts of the Corn Board as provided for in § 30-133.

Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the Corn Board on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the duly authorized officer of the Corn Board.

History.

1980, c. 395, §§ 3.1-1047, 3.1-1048; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1412.
Collection and disposition of assessment by handler; reports.

Every handler shall deduct from payments for corn made to a producer the amount of the assessment levied thereon, and shall remit such assessment to the Tax Commissioner pursuant to this chapter.

A report to the Tax Commissioner shall be on forms prescribed and furnished by the Tax Commissioner, and shall be a statement of the gross volume of corn handled by the handler and shall be filed with the Tax Commissioner covering corn handled during the preceding period, as set forth by the Tax Commissioner. The Tax Commissioner shall set forth the filing date or dates for reports and assessments and the period to be covered after consultation with the Virginia Grain Producers Association and Corn Board. The assessment levied on corn shall be due and payable by the handler on the same day as the report is due. The assessment shall be paid to the Tax Commissioner and be promptly paid into the state treasury to the credit of the Virginia Corn Fund.

Any assessment that is not paid when due shall be collected pursuant to §

3.2-1102

.

History.

1980, c. 395, §§ 3.1-1044, 3.1-1046; 1987, c. 476; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1413.
Records to be kept by handlers.

Every handler shall keep a complete record of the corn handled by him for a period of not less than three years from the time the corn was handled. Such records shall be open to the inspection of the Tax Commissioner, and shall be established and maintained as required by the Tax Commissioner.

History.

1980, c. 395, § 3.1-1045; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1414.
Falsification of records; misdemeanor.

It is a Class 1 misdemeanor:

For any handler knowingly to report falsely to the Tax Commissioner the quantity of corn handled by him during any period.

For any handler to falsify the records of the corn handled by him.

For any handler to preserve the records of the corn handled by him for less than three years from the time such corn was handled.

History.

1980, c. 395, § 3.1-1049; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.